Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-838
Attorney General; Nebraska State Patrol; duties.

Upon request of the director or Tax Commissioner, the Attorney General and the Nebraska State Patrol shall furnish to the director any information which they may have in their possession as may be necessary to ensure security, honesty, fairness, and integrity in the operation and administration of lottery games conducted pursuant to the State Lottery Act, including investigative reports and computerized information or data. For the purpose of requesting and receiving such information, the division shall be considered to be a criminal justice agency and shall be furnished such information without charge upon proper written request.

Laws 1991, LB 849, § 38;

Laws 1993, LB 138, § 57;

Laws 1995, LB 343, § 5.